District of Columbia statutes.
13-331

Service under other laws and rules of court.

This chapter does not limit or affect the right to serve process in any other manner now or hereafter required or permitted by:

(1)

other law, including Chapter 4 of this title or, any other provisions of this Code; or

(2)

rule of court.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 513, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 552, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 142(4)

Cross References

Attachment and garnishment proceedings, service of process in proceedings, see § 16-502.
Corporations, service of process upon, see § 29-612.
Insurance companies, service of process upon, see §§ 31-4323 and 31-2502.23.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 13-331.
1973 Ed., § 13-331.